finalproject.foma
# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u | a %: | e %: | i %: | o %: | u %:] ;
define C [ b | c | d | f | g | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v ] ;
define VShort [ a | e | i | o | u ];
define VLong [ a %: | e %: | i %: | o %: | u %:];
define VBack [a | o | u];
define VFront [i | e] ;
define DStops [t | d] ;
define BStops [p | b] ;
define VStops [k | g] ;
define Obstr [p | b | k | g | t | d ];
define Symbols [%: | %. | ' ] ;

read lexc finalproject.lexc
define Lexicon;


define Syncope V (->) 0 || [ %. \' ] _ [?* %.] ;


#Lenition Functions
define SLenition b (->) 0 , g (->) 0 , d (->) 0 || V (%.) (') _ V ;

#intervocalic position of voiceless obstruents voiced obstruents lenition
define BLenition p (->) b, c (->) g, t (->) d || V (%.) (') _ V ;

#preconsonantal position of voiceless obstruents to voiced obstruents lenition
define CLenition p (->) b, c (->) g, t (->) d ||  _ (%:) (%.) (') C ;

define LenitionQUtoGU  q u (->) g u || _ ;



#Degemination Function

define GLenition Obstr Obstr -> Obstr || V _ V ;


#Set of Epenhetic functions

define Epenthesis1 m (%:) (%.) (') n -> m %. b r || _ ;
define Epenthesis2 n (%:) (%.) (') r -> [n %. d r | r %. n ] || _ ;
define Epenthesis3 m (%:) (%.) (') l -> m %. b l || _ ;
define Epenthesis4 m (%:) (%.) (') r -> m %. b r || _ ;


#Basic Metathesis in alveolar nasal + liquid

define Metathesis1 n (%:) (%.) (') r (->) r %. n || _ ;



#Some of the first morphological rules in vulgar Latin
define GreatVowelMergerBack u -> o %: || _ \%:;
define GreatVowelMergerFront i \%: -> e %: || _ ;


#Diphthongization in the Stressed Pos and short
define ShortFrontHighMid e \%: -> i e %: || [' ?*] _ [\%:] ?* %. ;
define ShortBackHighMid o -> u e %: || ' C* _ \%: ;


#Set of Palatalization functions

define Palatalization1 c (%.) t -> c h || _  ;
define Palatalization2 l (%.) (') t  -> c h || u (%:) _ ;
define Palatalization3 c (%:) (%.) (') l -> j || _ ;
define RaisingFromCH a (%:) (%.) c h -> e c h || _ ;

#more specific rules
define LossofDoubleS s s -> j || _ ;
define LossFinal m -> 0 || _ .#. ;
define FtoH f -> h || .#. (') _ V \V ;
define Prosthesis (') s -> e ' s || .#. _ \V ;
define FrontHighMid i \%: -> e %: || [ ' ?* ] _ ;
deifne LossOfNasalandS n (->) 0 || _ [Symbols* s];


# Cleanup functions for used abstract notation
define CleanupUlt %: -> 0 || _ ;
define CleanupUlt1 %' -> 0 || _ ;
define CleanupUlt2 %. -> 0 || _ ;


# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc finalproject.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon
.o.
LossFinal .o.
Syncope .o.
SLenition .o.
GreatVowelMergerBack .o.
BLenition .o.
CLenition .o.
GreatVowelMergerFront .o.
LossFinal .o.
LossofDoubleS .o.
Prosthesis .o.
Epenthesis1 .o.
Epenthesis2 .o.
Epenthesis3 .o.
Epenthesis4 .o.
FrontHighMid .o.
Metathesis1 .o.
ShortFrontHighMid       .o.
ShortBackHighMid .o.
Palatalization1     .o.
Palatalization2     .o.
Palatalization3     .o.
RaisingFromCH   .o.
ShortBackHighMid .o.
LenitionQUtoGU .o.
FtoH .o.
LossOfNasalandS .o.
CleanupUlt .o.
CleanupUlt1 .o.
CleanupUlt2 .o.
Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
